Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1104
Sections; applicability.

From and after the passage, approval, and taking effect of sections 84-1101 to 84-1116, their provisions shall apply to and shall be binding upon all state offices and officers.

Laws 1959, c. 457, § 4, p. 1518.